West Virginia, session 2025, SB610.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-12o. Overtime pay exempt. Overtime pay shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this article. NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to exempt personal income tax on overtime pay.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home